Utah statutes.
63G-9-302.   Form for presentment of claim against the state or political subdivision.

Any person having a claim against the state or a political subdivision, for which funds have not been provided for the payment thereof, or the settlement of which is not otherwise provided for by law, must present the same to the Board of Examiners, accompanied by a statement showing the facts constituting the claim.

